src/verb-ciw-morph.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                           Ojibwe verb morphology                           !
! ========================================================================== !

! IA

LEXICON IACONJ
+V+IA: IA_IND ;
+V+IA: IA_SBJ ;
+V+IA: IA_IMP ;

LEXICON IA_IND
            IA_IND_SUFF ;
+Neg:%>siin IA_IND_SUFF ;


LEXICON IA_IND_SUFF

+Ind+Prs: IA_IND_PRS ;

LEXICON IA_IND_PRS
+1Sg@U.verb.1sgindep@:0@U.verb.1sgindep@ # ;
+2Sg@U.verb.2sgindep@:0@U.verb.2sgindep@ # ;
+3Sg@U.verb.3sgindep@:0@U.verb.3sgindep@ # ;
+3oSg@U.verb.3osgindep@:@U.verb.3osgindep@%>wan # ;
+3iSg@U.verb.3isgindep@:@U.verb.3isgindep@%>m # ;

+1Pl@U.verb.1plindep@:@U.verb.1plindep@%>min # ;   ! exclusive Pl
+12Pl@U.verb.12plindep@:@U.verb.12plindep@%>min # ; ! inclusive Pl
+2Pl@U.verb.2plindep@:@U.verb.2plindep@%>m # ;
+3Pl@U.verb.3plindep@:@U.verb.3plindep@%>wag # ;


LEXICON IA_SBJ
@U.verb.1sgsbj@  1sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.2sgsbj@  2sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3sgsbj@  3sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3osgsbj@ 3osgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3isgsbj@ 3isgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.1plsbj@  1plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.12plsbj@ 12plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.2plsbj@  2plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3plsbj@  3plsubjunctive ;

LEXICON 1sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+1Sg:%>yaan #;
+Neg+Sbj+1Sg:%>siwaan  # ;

LEXICON 2sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+2Sg:%>yan	#;
+Neg+Sbj+2Sg:%>siwan   # ;

LEXICON 3sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3Sg:%>d	#;
+Neg+Sbj+3Sg:%>sig	   # ;

LEXICON 3osgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3oSg:%>nid #;
+Neg+Sbj+3oSg:%>sinid  # ;
+Neg+Sbj+3oSg:%>sinig  # ;

LEXICON 3isgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3iSg:%>ng #;
+Neg+Sbj+3iSg:%>sing   # ;

LEXICON 1plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+1Pl:%>yaang #;
+Neg+Sbj+1Pl:%>siwaang # ;

LEXICON 12plsubjunctive
    +Sbj+12Pl:%>yang #;
+Neg+Sbj+12Pl:%>siwang # ;

LEXICON 2plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+2Pl:%>yeg #;
+Neg+Sbj+2Pl:%>siweg   # ;

LEXICON 3plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+3Pl:%>waad #;
+Neg+Sbj+3Pl:%>siwaa   # ;



LEXICON IA_IMP
@U.verb.2sgimp@  2sgimp ;
@U.verb.1plimp@  1plimp ;
@U.verb.2plimp@  2plimp ;

LEXICON 2sgimp
+Imp+Imm+2Sg:%>n   # ;
+Imp+Int+2Sg:%>ken # ;
+Imp+Dur+2Sg:%>kan # ;

LEXICON 1plimp
+Imp+Imm+1Pl:%>daa	  # ;
+Imp+Int+1Pl:%>siidaa # ;

LEXICON 2plimp
+Imp+Imm+2Pl:%>k	 # ;
+Imp+Imm+2Pl:%>g	 # ;
+Imp+Int+2Pl:%>kegon # ;
+Imp+Dur+2Pl:%>keg	 # ;



! II
! ==

LEXICON IICONJ
+V+II+Ind+Prs: II_IND_PRS ;
+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs: II_NEG_IND_PRS ;
+V+II+Sbj: II_SBJ ;
+V+II+Neg+Sbj: II_NEG_SBJ ;

LEXICON II_IND_PRS 
+3Sg: # ;
+3oSg:%>ni # ;
+3Pl:%>wan # ;
+3oPl:%>niwan # ;

LEXICON II_NEG_IND_PRS
+3Sg:%>siinoon # ;
+3oSg:%>sinini # ;
+3Pl:%>siinoon # ;
+3oPl:%>sininiwan # ;

LEXICON II_SBJ 
+3Sg:%>g # ;
+3oSg:%>nig # ;
+3Pl:%>g # ;
+3oPl:%>nig # ;

LEXICON II_NEG_SBJ 
+3Sg:%>sinog # ;
+3oSg:%>sininig # ;
+3Pl:%>sinog # ;
+3oPl:%>sininig # ;
